Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4135.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 99b of Title 21, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Upon the effective date of this act, all cross-deputization
agreements entered between the state or local governmental agency
and a federally recognized Indian tribe shall contain the following
provisions and be in the following form and format:
PURPOSE. The purposes of this Agreement are to:


Req. No. 13926 Page 1

1. Provide for the cross-deputization of officers employed by
the various governmental agencies that are or shall become parties
hereto.
2. Authorize commissioned officers to provide law enforcement
services and make lawful arrests on or near Indian country within
the geographic area of the ____________________________ reservation.
3. Authorize commissioned officers to react immediately to
observed violations of the law and other emergency situations,
regardless of whether such occurrences violate the criminal statutes
of the ____________________________ (Indian tribe), the United
States, and/or the State of Oklahoma.
4. Provide for efficient, effective, and cooperative law
enforcement efforts on or near Indian country in the geographic area
of the ____________________________ (Indian tribe) within the State
of Oklahoma.
5. Eliminate uncertainties that have caused reluctance among
various law enforcement agencies to provide services on or near
Indian country for fear of being subjected to tort or civil rights
suits as a consequence of good-faith errors by officers making
arrests or quelling disturbances in Indian country.
6. Provide comprehensive law enforcement protection to citizens
of the State of Oklahoma and the ____________________________
(Indian tribe), whether they are on or off Indian country within the
geographic area of the ____________________________ (Indian tribe),
Req. No. 13926 Page 2

incl uding, but not limited to, responding to observed violations of
the law, effecting arrests, responding to calls for assistance,
performing investigations, and providing other assistance such as
dispatching and detention.
AUTHORITY. This Agreement is entered into pursuant to the
authority granted by the laws of the United States, the State of
Oklahoma, and the ____________________________ (Indian tribe).
DEFINITIONS. For purposes of this Agreement:
1. "Commissioned officer" means any law enforcement officer who
has been duly appointed and authorized by a participating
governmental entity.
2. "Indian Country" refers to all land within the limits of any
Indian reservation under the jurisdiction of the United States
Government.
TERMS AND CONDITIONS. Each party shall:
1. Maintain liability insurance or self-insurance coverage for
its officers.
2. Provide training to its officers regarding the scope of
authority granted under this Agreement.
3. This Agreement shall remain in effect until terminated by
mutual consent or by written notice from any party.
EFFECTIVE DATE. This Agreement shall become effective upon
execution by all parties.

Req. No. 13926 Page 3

IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have executed this
Agreement on the dates indicated below:
_______________ _______________
(Date) (Signature)

_______________ _______________
(Date) (Signature)
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-13926 GRS 01/10/26
















Req. No. 13926 Page 4